Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-911
Public schools; contracts in securing funds, services, and commodities; filed in office of State Department of Education; channeled and administered.

A copy of all contracts, agreements or arrangements made by any public school or public educational institution, under the supervision of the State Department of Education, in securing funds, services, and commodities from the federal government or its agencies, as provided by section 81-910, shall be filed in the office of the department. Any federal funds made available for public schools in this state shall be channeled through the department and be administered in conformity with the laws of this state.

Laws 1945, c. 239, § 2, p. 718;

Laws 1947, c. 318, § 1(1), p. 960;

Laws 1977, LB 548, § 8.